Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1219
Taxable tangible personal property; assessment certificate; county assessor; duties.

It shall be the duty of the county assessor, when required by any person, to give a certificate of assessment of taxable tangible personal property showing the amount, kind, location, and net book value of the property assessed, and such certificate shall be evidence of the legal assessment of such property for the year.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 45, p. 399;

R.S.1913, § 6330;

C.S.1922, § 5931;

C.S.1929, § 77-1418;

R.S.1943, § 77-1219;

Laws 1947, c. 250, § 15, p. 793;

Laws 1947, c. 251, § 22, p. 818;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 215;

Laws 1987, LB 508, § 34;

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 97;

Laws 1992, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 70;

Laws 1997, LB 270, § 49;

Laws 2008, LB965, § 7.